Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2004
County officers; removal by judicial proceedings; complaint; verification.

The complaint shall be by an accuser against the accused, and shall contain the charges with the necessary specifications under them, and be verified by the affidavit of any elector of the state that he believes the charges to be true.

R.S.1866, c. 45, § 4, p. 298;

R.S.1913, § 5701;

C.S.1922, § 5031;

C.S.1929, § 26-1704;

R.S.1943, § 23-2004.

Complaint set out and held sufficient. Stewart v. Bole, 61 Neb. 193, 85 N.W. 33 (1901).